Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 4 UNIFORM PARENTAGE ACT
19-4-111. Pretrial proceedings.

As soon as practicable after an action to declare the existence or nonexistence of the father-child relationship has been brought, an informal hearing shall be held if it is determined by the court to be in the child's best interest. The court may order
that the hearing be held before a magistrate. The public shall be barred from the hearing if it is determined by the court to be in the best interest of any of the parties. A record of the proceeding or any portion thereof shall
be kept if any party requests or the court orders. Rules of evidence need not be observed. At the informal hearing, the judge or magistrate shall give a verbal advisement to the parties that a request for genetic tests shall not
prejudice the requesting party in matters concerning allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to section 14-10-124 (1.5), C.R.S. The judge or magistrate shall further advise the parties that, if genetic tests are not obtained
prior to the legal establishment of paternity and submitted into evidence prior to the entry of the final order establishing paternity, the genetic tests may not be allowed into evidence at a later date.

Upon the refusal of any witness, including a party, to testify under oath or produce evidence, the court may order such witness to testify under oath and produce evidence concerning all relevant facts. If the refusal is upon the ground that such witness'
testimony or evidence might tend to incriminate such witness, the court may grant such witness immunity from the use of the testimony or evidence the witness is required to produce to prove the commission of a criminal offense
by the witness. The refusal of a witness who has been granted immunity to obey an order to testify or produce evidence is a civil contempt of the court.

Testimony of a physician concerning the medical circumstances of the pregnancy and the condition and characteristics of the child upon birth is not privileged.

Upon the filing of a petition under this article, any party may seek the issuance of a temporary protection order or injunction under the criteria set forth in section 14-10-108, C.R.S. Any party may further seek temporary orders as to the allocation
of parental responsibilities, including allocation of decision-making responsibility and parenting time, and support once an order determining the existence of the parent and child relationship has been entered by the court. The
filing of a motion for temporary orders shall not prevent a party or public agency from seeking other relief as may be provided by this article. Issues of temporary orders concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities,
including decision-making responsibility and parenting time, and issues of support shall be determined in accordance with the criteria set forth in the "Uniform Dissolution of Marriage Act", article 10 of title 14, C.R.S. Any temporary
protection order issued pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be on a standardized form prescribed by the judicial department, and a copy shall be provided to the protected person.

At the time a protection order is requested pursuant to this section, the court shall inquire about, and the requesting party and such party's attorney shall have an independent duty to disclose, knowledge such party and such party's attorney may have
concerning the existence of any prior protection orders of any court addressing in whole or in part the subject matter of the requested protection order.

The duties of peace officers enforcing orders issued pursuant to this section shall be in accordance with section 18-6-803.5, C.R.S., and any rules adopted by the Colorado supreme court pursuant to said section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 796, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(1) amended, p. 363, § 35, effective April 9.

L. 93:
(2) amended, p. 1737, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(4) to (6) added, p. 2016, § 11, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:
(4) amended, p. 1409, § 70, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2003:
(4) and (5) amended, p.1016, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(1) amended, p. 378, § 5, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-111 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-112. Genetic or other tests - administrative subpoena to compel genetic testing.

Upon motion of the court or any of the interested parties, genetic tests or other tests of inherited characteristics shall be ordered and the results received in evidence, as provided in section 13-25-126. Upon agreement of the mother and the presumed
or alleged father or fathers, genetic tests or other tests of inherited characteristics may be administered prior to filing of an action. If the action is then filed, the test results must be admitted into evidence as provided
in section 13-25-126.

A delegate child support enforcement unit is authorized to produce, issue, and serve a subpoena to compel a party in a juvenile court case to appear, at a specified location and time, for a genetic test sample that is collected for assistance in paternity
determination. The subpoena must allow a lab-certified child support enforcement unit sample collector, an accredited genetic-testing laboratory company, a health clinic, or a hospital to conduct a buccal swab or other
lab-approved collection method of the alleged father, mother, and child whose paternity is at issue. The sample may then be used for paternity testing purposes, provided appropriate chain-of-custody documentation is followed.
Test results obtained through the subpoena may be admitted as evidence pursuant to section 13-25-126. The subpoena may be served by first-class mail or by electronic means, if that notice preference by the party is documented.

If a party fails to honor the first subpoena, the delegate child support enforcement unit may issue a second subpoena or file the appropriate motion with the court to compel compliance with a judicial genetic testing order pursuant to section 13-25-126.
If the delegate child support enforcement unit issues a second subpoena and that subpoena is not honored, the delegate child support enforcement unit may file the appropriate motion with the court to compel compliance with
a judicial genetic testing order pursuant to section 13-25-126. A nonappearance default may be sought against a nonappearing party only after a judicial genetic testing order is not honored.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 796, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
Entire section amended, p. 254, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
Entire section amended, (HB 18-1363), ch. 389, p. 2322, § 2, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-112 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-113. Evidence relating to paternity.

Evidence relating to paternity may include:

Evidence of sexual intercourse between the mother and alleged father at any possible time of conception;

An expert's opinion concerning the statistical probability of the alleged father's paternity based upon the duration of the mother's pregnancy;

Genetic test results, weighted in accordance with evidence, if available, of the statistical probability of the alleged father's paternity;

Medical or anthropological evidence relating to the alleged father's paternity of the child based on tests performed by experts. If a man has been identified as a possible father of the child, the court may, and upon request of a party shall, require
the child, the mother, and the man to submit to appropriate tests; and

All other evidence relevant to the issue of paternity of the child.

In any action brought pursuant to article 13 or 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., the parties shall be required to use the laboratory designated by the delegate child support enforcement unit for genetic tests or other tests of inherited characteristics. Any
subsequent test or other tests shall be determined by the court as provided in section 13-25-126, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 796, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
(2) added, p. 183, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 97:
(1)(c) amended, p. 562, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-113 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-114. Pretrial recommendations - temporary orders.

On the basis of the information produced at the pretrial hearing, the judge or magistrate conducting the hearing shall evaluate the probability of determining the existence or nonexistence of the father and child relationship in a trial and whether a
judicial declaration of the relationship would be in the best interest of the child. On the basis of the evaluation, an appropriate recommendation for settlement shall be made to the parties, which may include any of the following:

That the action be dismissed with or without prejudice;

That the matter be compromised by an agreement among the alleged father, the mother, and the child in which the father and child relationship is not determined but in which a defined economic obligation is undertaken by the alleged father in favor of
the child and, if appropriate, in favor of the mother, subject to approval by the judge or magistrate conducting the hearing. In reviewing the obligation undertaken by the alleged father in a compromise agreement, the judge
or magistrate conducting the hearing shall consider the best interest of the child, in the light of the factors enumerated in section 19-4-116 (6), discounted by the improbability, as it appears to him, of establishing
the alleged father's paternity or nonpaternity of the child in a trial of the action. In the best interest of the child, the court may order that the alleged father's identity be kept confidential. In that case, the court
may designate a person or agency to receive from the alleged father and disburse on behalf of the child all amounts paid by the alleged father in fulfillment of obligations imposed on him.

That the alleged father voluntarily acknowledge his paternity of the child;

That the action be consolidated with a relinquishment action filed pursuant to part 1 of article 5 of this title.

If the parties accept a recommendation made in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, judgment shall be entered accordingly.

If a party refuses to accept a recommendation made under subsection (1) of this section and genetic tests have not been taken, the court shall require the parties to submit to genetic tests, if practicable. Thereafter, the judge or magistrate shall make
an appropriate final recommendation. If a party refuses to accept the final recommendation, the action shall be set for trial. If the evidence relating to paternity meets the requirements set forth in section 13-25-126 (1)(g),
C.R.S., the court shall issue temporary orders establishing current child support, foster care maintenance, and medical support to remain in effect pending a final disposition of the proceeding.

The guardian ad litem may accept or refuse to accept a recommendation under this section.

The informal hearing may be terminated and the action set for trial if the judge or magistrate conducting the hearing finds unlikely that all parties would accept a recommendation he might make under subsection (1) or (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 797, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
(1), (3), and (5) amended, p. 363, § 36, effective April 9.

L. 93:
(1)(b) amended, p. 1780, § 43, effective June 6.

L. 97:
(3) amended, p. 562, § 10, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1275, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2003:
(3) amended, p. 1270, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 2005:
(1)(d) added, p. 102, § 4, effective July 1.

19-4-115. Civil action.

An action under this article is a civil action governed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure. The mother of the child and the alleged father are competent to testify and may be compelled to testify. Sections 19-4-111 (2) and (3), 19-4-112, and 19-4-113
apply.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 798, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 91:
Entire section amended, p. 254, § 12, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-115 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-116. Judgment or order - birth-related costs - evidence.

The judgment or order of the court determining the existence or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship is determinative for all purposes.

If the judgment or order of the court is at variance with the child's birth certificate or if the court enters a judgment or order determining the existence of a parent and child relationship during the course of a proceeding held pursuant to article
3 of this title, the court shall order that a new birth certificate be issued under section 19-4-124.

The judgment or order may contain any other provision directed against the appropriate party to the proceeding concerning the duty of support, the recovery of child support debt pursuant to section 14-14-104, C.R.S., the allocation of parental responsibilities
with respect to the child and guardianship of the child, parenting time privileges with the child, the furnishing of bond or other security for the payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best interest of the
child. The judgment or order may direct the father to pay for genetic testing and to pay the reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement.

Repealed.

Bills for pregnancy, childbirth expenses, and genetic testing are admissible as evidence without the necessity of third-party foundation testimony and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the amounts incurred for such services or for expenses incurred
on behalf of the child.

Support judgments or orders ordinarily shall be for periodic payments which may vary in amount. In the best interest of the child, a lump-sum payment or the purchase of an annuity may be ordered in lieu of periodic payments of support. The court or delegate
child support enforcement unit may enter an order directing the father to pay for support of the child, in an amount as may be determined by the court or delegate child support enforcement unit to be reasonable under the circumstances,
for a time period which occurred prior to the entry of the order establishing paternity. The court may limit the father's liability for past support of the child to the proportion of the expenses already incurred that the court
deems just.

The judgment or order may include a provision requiring that the respondent initiate inclusion of the child under a medical insurance policy currently in effect for the benefit of the respondent, purchase medical insurance for the child, or in some other
manner provide for the current or future medical needs of the child. At the same time, the court may make a determination of whose responsibility it shall be to pay required medical insurance deductibles and copayments. If the
judgment or order does not contain a provision regarding medical support, such as insurance coverage, payment for medical insurance deductibles and copayments, or unreimbursed medical expenses, that fact may be grounds for a modification
of the order under section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

In determining the amount to be paid by a parent for support of the child and the period during which the duty of support is owed, a court enforcing the obligation of support shall consider all relevant facts, including:

The needs of the child;

The standard of living and circumstances of the parents;

The relative financial means of the parents;

The earning ability of the parents;

The need and capacity of the child for education, including higher education;

The age of the child;

The financial resources and the earning ability of the child;

The responsibility of the parents for the support of others;

The value of services contributed by the parent with whom the child resides the majority of the time;

The standard of living the child would have enjoyed had the parents been married; and

The child support guidelines, as set forth in section 14-10-115, C.R.S.

Any order of support made pursuant to subsections (4) to (6) of this section shall continue until the child is nineteen years of age, unless the support order is terminated sooner by court order.

The court may order support to be continued after the child is nineteen years of age if the child is unable to care for himself or herself by reason of mental or physical disability or other reason justifiable in the opinion of the court.

All child support orders entered pursuant to this article shall include the names and dates of birth of the parties and of the children who are the subject of the order and the parties' residential and mailing addresses. The social security numbers of
the parties and children shall be collected pursuant to sections 14-14-113 and 26-13-127, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 798, § 1, effective October 1; (6)(i) and (6)(j) amended and (6)(k) added, p. 1587, § 60, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(3), (5), and (7) amended, p. 794, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 93:
(3) amended, p. 582, § 21, effective July 1; (8) amended, p. 1638, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(4), (7), and (8) amended, p. 1542, § 15, effective May 31.

L. 95:
(3) amended, p. 1397, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(3)(a) amended and (3)(c) and (9) added, p. 1276, §§ 15, 16, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(3)(a) and (6)(i) amended, p. 1409, § 71, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:
(2) and (9) amended, p. 1086, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:
(9) amended, p. 1348, § 4 effective July 1.

19-4-117. Costs.

The court shall order reasonable fees of counsel, experts, and the child's guardian ad litem and other costs of the action and pretrial proceedings, including genetic tests, to be paid by the parties in proportions and at times determined by the court.
In any action brought pursuant to article 13 or 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., the final costs of any genetic tests or other tests of inherited characteristics shall be assessed against the nonprevailing party on the parentage issue.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 799, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 92:
Entire section amended, p. 183, § 2, effective August 1.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 563, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-117 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-118. Enforcement of judgment or order.

If existence of the father and child relationship is declared, or paternity or a duty of support has been acknowledged or adjudicated under this article or under prior law, the obligation of the father may be enforced in the same or other proceedings
by the mother, the child, or the public authority that has furnished or may furnish the reasonable expenses of pregnancy, confinement, education, support, or funeral, or by any other person, including a private agency, to the extent
he has furnished or is furnishing these expenses.

The court may order support payments to be made to the obligee, the clerk of the court, in those cases in which the executive director of the department of human services has notified the state court administrator pursuant to section 26-13-114 (5), C.R.S.,
that the judicial district in which the court is situated is ready to participate in the family support registry, through the family support registry, or a person, corporation, or agency designated to administer them for the benefit
of the child under the supervision of the court. The court may not order payments to be made to the clerk of the court once payments may be made through the family support registry.

Willful failure to obey the judgment or order of the court is a civil contempt of the court. All remedies for the enforcement of judgments apply.

In making any order for support pursuant to this section, the court shall take into consideration the capability of both parents to provide support.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 799, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 98:
(2) amended, p. 766, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-118 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-119. Modification of judgment or order.

The court has continuing jurisdiction to modify or revoke a judgment or order:

For future education and support; and

With respect to matters listed in sections 19-4-116 (3) and (4) and 19-4-118 (2); except that a court entering a judgment or order for the payment of a lump sum or the purchase of an annuity under section 19-4-116 (4) may specify that the judgment or
order may not be modified or revoked.

The court may modify an order of support only in accordance with the provisions of and the standard for modification in section 14-10-122, C.R.S.

The trial court retains jurisdiction to modify an order concerning child support or concerning the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities based on a change in circumstances during the pendency of an appeal.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 799, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
(2) added, p. 892, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2021:
(3) added, (HB 21-1031), ch. 116, p. 451, § 7, effective May 7.

19-4-120. Represented by counsel.

At the pretrial hearing and in further proceedings, any party may be represented by counsel.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 799, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-120 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-121. Hearings and records - confidentiality. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 90:
Entire section repealed, p. 1012, § 8, effective July 1.

19-4-122. Action to declare mother and child relationship.

Any interested party may bring an action to determine the existence or nonexistence of a mother and child relationship. Insofar as practicable, the provisions of this article applicable to the father and child relationship apply.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-122 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-123. Promise to render support.

Any promise in writing to furnish support for a child, growing out of a supposed or alleged father and child relationship, does not require consideration and is enforceable according to its terms, subject to section 19-4-107 (4).

In the best interest of the child or the mother, the court may, and upon the promisor's request shall, order the promise to be kept in confidence and designate a person or agency to receive and disburse on behalf of the child all amounts paid in performance
of the promise.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-123 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-124. Birth records.

Upon order of a court of this state or upon an order issued and filed pursuant to article 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., or upon request of a court of another state, the state registrar of vital statistics shall prepare a new certificate of birth consistent
with the findings of the court and shall substitute the new certificate for the original certificate of birth.

The fact that the father and child relationship was declared after the child's birth shall not be ascertainable from the new certificate, but the actual place and date of birth shall be shown.

The evidence upon which the new certificate was made and the original birth certificate shall be kept in a sealed and confidential file and be subject to inspection only upon consent of the court and all interested persons or, in exceptional cases only,
upon an order of the court for good cause shown.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1) amended, p. 1247, § 6, effective April 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-124 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-125. "Father" defined.

In case of a maternity suit against a purported mother, where appropriate in the context, the word "father" shall mean "mother".

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-127 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-126. Uniformity of application and construction.

This article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this article among states enacting it.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-128 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-127. Severability.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and, to this end, the provisions of this article are severable.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 800, § 1, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-6-129 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-4-128. Right to trial to court.

Any party may demand a trial to the court to determine the existence or nonexistence of the parent and child relationship. No party may demand a jury trial, and notwithstanding any demand which may have been made, trial shall be to the court and not to
a jury.

Source:

L. 88:
Entire section added, p. 746, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 92:
Entire section amended, p. 183, § 3, effective August 1.

L. 94:
Entire section amended, p. 1542, § 16, effective May 31.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 1276, § 17, effective July 1.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997.

19-4-129. Child support - guidelines - schedule of basic support obligations.

The provisions of section 14-10-115, C.R.S., shall apply to all child support obligations, established or modified, as part of any proceeding under this article, whether filed on or subsequent to July 1, 1988.

Source:

L. 88:
Entire section added, p. 746, § 15, effective July 1.

19-4-130. Temporary orders.

Upon the filing of any proceeding under this article or under article 13.5 of title 26, C.R.S., the court shall, as soon as practicable, enter a temporary or permanent order allocating parental responsibilities that shall allocate the decision-making
responsibility and parenting time of the child until further order of the court.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any paternity determination made pursuant to section 14-5-402, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 92:
Entire section added, p. 184, § 4, effective August 1.

L. 96:
Entire section amended, p. 612, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 98:
(1) amended, p. 1410, § 72, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2015:
(2) amended, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 568, § 35, effective July 1.